Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5054.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103G.611, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Shallow lakes. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the commissioner must issue a water aeration permit under this section to an applicant if: new text end new text begin (1) the aeration system will be used in a lake or chain of lakes with a maximum depth of eight to 15 feet; new text end new text begin (2) the aeration system will be used in a lake or chain of lakes of 100 to 750 acres; and new text end new text begin (3) the installation and operation of the aeration system will be paid for with nonstate money. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this subdivision requires issuing a water aeration permit if issuing the permit would have the effect of allowing aeration in a lake or chain of lakes more frequently than two out of every three years. new text end